Utah statutes.
17-53-211.   Fees for services -- Exceptions.

The legislative body of each county shall adopt an ordinance establishing fees for services provided by each county officer, except:

(1)  fees for the recorder, sheriff, and county constables; and

(2)  fees established by statute.



Enacted by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

